Washington statutes.
RCW 11.130.730

Disqualification of supporter.

The following are disqualified from acting as a supporter:

(1) A person who is an employer or employee of the adult with a disability, unless the person is an immediate family member of the adult with a disability;

(2) A person directly providing paid support services to the adult with a disability, unless the person is an immediate family member of the adult with a disability; and

(3) An individual against whom the person with a disability has obtained an order of protection from abuse, or an individual who is the subject of a civil or criminal order prohibiting contact with the adult with a disability.

[ 2020 c 312 s 607.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2020 c 312: See note following RCW 11.130.915.